incubator/apertium-sh-sl.sl.dix
    <pardef n="hodi/ti__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>š</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mo</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- JERNEJ future tense-->
      <!-- JERNEJ WATCH OUT, THIS IS WRONG!!!-->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="hoditi"><i>hodi</i><par n="hodi/ti__vblex"/></e>
